Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.530

Real property—Services and facilities available to other state agencies, cost.

Upon request by any state agency vested by law with the authority to acquire or manage real property, the department shall make available to such agency the facilities and services of the department with respect to such acquisition or management, upon condition that such agency reimburse the department for the costs of such services.

[ 2003 c 334 s 117; 1965 c 8 s 43.30.260. Prior: 1957 c 38 s 26. Formerly RCW 43.30.260.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.